Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 475C.017 is amended to read:
475C.017. (1) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission has the duties, functions and powers
specified in ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586 and the powers necessary or  proper
to enable the commission to carry out the commission’s duties, functions and  powers under ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586. The  jurisdiction, supervision, duties, functions and
powers of the commission extend to any person that produces, processes,  transports, delivers, sells,
purchases or tests a marijuana item in this state. The commission may sue and be sued.
(2) The duties, functions and powers of the commission specified in ORS 475C.005  to 475C.525
and 475C.540 to 475C.586 include the following:
(a) To regulate the production, processing, transportation, delivery, sale, purchase and testing
of marijuana items in accordance with  the provisions of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to
475C.586.
(b) To issue, renew, suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew  licenses for the production,
processing, sale or testing of marijuana items, or other licenses related to the consumption  of
marijuana items, and to permit, in the commission’s discretion, the transfer of  a license between
persons.
(c) To adopt, amend or repeal rules as necessary to carry out the intent and provisions of ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540  to 475C.586, including rules that the commission considers nec-
essary to protect the public health and safety.
(d) To exercise all powers incidental, convenient or necessary to enable the commission to  ad-
minister or carry out the provisions of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586  or any
other law of this state that charges the commission with a  duty, function or power related to
marijuana. Powers described in this paragraph include, but are not limited to:
(A) Issuing subpoenas;
(B) Compelling the attendance of witnesses;
(C) Administering oaths;
(D) Certifying official acts;
(E) Taking depositions as provided by law;
Enrolled House Bill 3724 (HB 3724-INTRO) Page 1
(F) Compelling the production of books, payrolls, accounts,  papers, records, documents and tes-
timony; and
(G) Establishing  fees in addition to the application, licensing and renewal fees described in ORS
475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093, 475C.097 and 475C.548, provided that any fee established by  the com-
mission is reasonably calculated not to exceed the cost of the activity for  which the fee is charged.
(e) To adopt rules regulating and prohibiting advertising marijuana items in a manner  that :
(A) [ That is appealing to minors ] Is likely to cause minors  to unlawfully possess or consume
marijuana or marijuana items, in order  to prevent the unlawful possession or consumption
of marijuana or marijuana items by minors ;
(B) [ That] Promotes excessive use;
(C) [ That] Promotes illegal activity; or
(D) [ That] Otherwise presents a significant risk to public health and safety.
(f) To regulate the use of  marijuana items for other purposes as deemed necessary or appropri-
ate by the commission.
(g) To establish pilot programs, of not more than three years  in duration, to expand access to
marijuana for medical use for  registry identification cardholders and designated primary caregivers,
as defined in ORS 475C.777.
(h) To regulate the processing,  transportation, delivery, sale, purchase and testing of artificially
derived cannabinoids  in accordance with the provisions of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540
to 475C.586.
(i) To regulate the testing and labeling of  inhalant delivery systems, as defined in ORS 431A.175,
that include industrial hemp-derived vapor items, as defined in ORS 475C.540, that are sold in this
state by any person.
(3) Fees collected pursuant to subsection (2)(d)(G) of this section shall be deposited in  the
Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS 475C.297.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 475C.612 is amended to read:
475C.612. (1) As is necessary to protect the  public health and safety, and in consultation with
the Oregon Health Authority and  the State Department of Agriculture, the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission shall adopt rules  establishing standards for the packaging of marijuana items,
including but not limited to:
(a) Ensuring  that cannabinoid concentrates and extracts, cannabinoid edibles and other
cannabinoid products are:
(A) Packaged in child-resistant safety packaging; and
(B) Not marketed in a manner that:
(i) Is untruthful or misleading;
(ii) [ Is attractive to minors ] Is likely to cause minors  to unlawfully possess or consume
cannabinoid concentrates, cannabinoid extracts, cannabinoid edibles or other cannabinoid
products, in order to prevent the unlawful  possession or consumption of cannabinoid pro-
ducts by minors ; or
(iii) Otherwise creates a significant risk of harm to public health and safety;
(b) Ensuring that usable marijuana, including usable marijuana that is pre-rolled, is not  mar-
keted in a manner that:
(A) Is untruthful and misleading;
(B) [ Is attractive  to minors ] Is likely to cause minors to unlawfully possess or consume us-
able marijuana, in order to prevent the unlawful possession or consumption of usable
marijuana by minors ; or
(C) Otherwise creates a significant risk of harm to public health and safety; and
(c) In order to prevent  the unlawful possession or consumption of cannabinoid edibles and
other cannabinoid products by minors,  ensuring that cannabinoid edibles  and other cannabinoid
products are not packaged in a manner that [ is attractive to minors ] is likely to  cause minors to
unlawfully possess or consume cannibinoid edibles and other cannabinoid products .
Enrolled House Bill 3724 (HB 3724-INTRO) Page 2
(2) In adopting rules under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919, the authority shall require  all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products  and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts transferred by a med-
ical marijuana dispensary  registered under ORS 475C.833 to be packaged in accordance with sub-
section (1) of this section and rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) In adopting rules under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, the  commission shall require all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts sold  or transferred by
a marijuana retailer that holds  a license under ORS 475C.097 to be packaged in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section and rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) In adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section, the commission:
(a) May establish different packaging standards for different  varieties of usable marijuana and
for different types of cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts[ ;].
(b) May establish different minimum packaging standards for  persons registered under ORS
475C.770 to 475C.919 and persons licensed under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525[ ;].
(c) May consider the effect on the environment of requiring certain packaging[ ;].
(d) Shall consider the  cost of a potential requirement and how that cost will affect the cost to
the ultimate consumer of the marijuana item[ ; and ].
(e) In order to prevent the unlawful possession or consumption of marijuana items by
minors, shall describe, using objective criteria, packaging that is likely  to cause minors to
unlawfully possess or consume marijuana items. The  objective criteria must include, but is
not limited to,  prohibiting packaging that uses imagery or characters primarily associated
with minors when such associations are likely to result in  minors unlawfully possessing or
consuming marijuana items.
[(e)] (f) May not adopt rules that are more restrictive  than is reasonably necessary to protect
the public health and safety.
SECTION 3.
(1) The amendments to ORS 475C.017 and 475C.612 by sections  1 and 2 of this
2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may take any  action before the opera-
tive date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the commission
to exercise,  on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of
the duties, functions  and powers conferred on the commission by the amendments to ORS
475C.017 and 475C.612 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3724 (HB 3724-INTRO) Page 3
Passed by House April 8, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3724 (HB 3724-INTRO) Page 4